Utah statutes.
76-5-104.   Consensual altercation.
In any prosecution for criminal homicide under Part 2 of this chapter or
assault, it is no defense to the prosecution that the defendant was a party to
any duel, mutual combat, or other consensual altercation if during the course
of the duel, combat, or altercation any dangerous weapon as defined in Section
76-1-601 was used or if the defendant was engaged in an ultimate fighting
match as defined in Section 76-9-705.
